Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 8

Optometry Law

63-8-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Optometry Law.”

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3654a9b1; mod. Code 1932, § 7026; C. Supp. 1950, § 7026; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-801.

Cross-References. Aid to the blind, title 71, ch. 4, part 1.

Assignment of insurance benefits to health care provider, § 56-7-118.

Occupation tax on optometrists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-8-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of optometry created by this chapter or similar boards created by the optometry law of other states;

“Certificate of fitness” means the certificate issued by the board certifying to the division that the person therein named has met the requirements of this chapter and passed the standard examination given by the board;

“Certificate of registration” means the certificate issued by the division of health related boards under chapter 1 of this title;

“Division” means the division of health related boards in the department of health;

“Itinerant certificate” means a certificate issued to an itinerant optometrist;

“Itinerant optometrist” means an optometrist who maintains an office at a location other than such optometrist's principal office;

“Muscular anomalies” means any deviation from the normal standard;

“Objective method” means examination for observing symptoms and/or signs with various instruments and techniques that the optometrist finds by means of one (1) or more of the optometrist's five (5) senses; an examination of the eye or eyes conducted by an optometrist, independent of the patient's statements;

“Ophthalmic materials” means any lens that has a spherical, cylindrical or prismatic power or value used before or upon the eye, any contact lens that has no prescription power and any frame or other appliance used for the purpose of holding or positioning any ophthalmic lenses before the eyes;

“Optometrist” means a person who is engaged in the practice of optometry as defined;

“Orthoptic training” means any ocular exercise for the correction or relief of abnormal muscles or functions of the eyes;

“Practice of optometry as a profession” means:

The employment of objective or subjective methods, either or both, for the purpose of ascertaining defects of vision or muscular anomalies or other abnormal conditions of the eyes;

The prescribing of ophthalmic lenses or prisms to remedy or relieve defects of vision or muscular anomalies and the prescribing of contact lenses, including those with prescription power and those without prescription power which are worn for cosmetic purposes;

The orthoptic training, the adjusting or fitting or adapting of lenses or prisms or eyeglasses or spectacles to remedy or relieve defects of vision or muscular anomalies; or

The supplying, replacement or duplication of an ophthalmic lens or frame; and

One who is engaged in the practice of optometry as a profession as defined in this subdivision (12) and who has sufficient education and professional competence, as determined by the board, is authorized to examine, diagnose, manage and treat conditions and diseases of the eye and eyelid including:

The administration and prescribing of pharmaceutical agents rational to the diagnosis and treatment of conditions or diseases of the eye or eyelid;

The performance of primary eye care procedures rational to the treatment of conditions or diseases of the eye or eyelid as determined by the board;

The performance or ordering of procedures and laboratory tests rational to the diagnosis of conditions or diseases of the eye or eyelid;

Additionally, the authority to administer benadryl, epinephrine or equivalent medication to counteract anaphylaxis or anaphylactic reaction; and

The use of a local anesthetic in conjunction with the primary care treatment of an eyelid lesion; provided, however, that no optometrist shall use a local anesthetic for this purpose unless that optometrist has met the certification requirements set forth in § 63-8-112(4) and in the rules of the board of optometry for the administration of pharmaceutical agents in the performance of primary eye care procedures. Nothing in this subdivision (12)(E)(i)(e ) shall be construed as allowing an optometrist to perform any reconstructive surgical procedure on the eyelid. Nothing in this subdivision (12)(E)(i)(e ) shall be construed as allowing an optometrist to perform any procedure not approved by the board of optometry prior to April 8, 2014;

An optometrist may utilize local anesthesia by injection in performing the following procedures pursuant to this subdivision (12)(E)(i)(e ):

Needle drainage of an eyelid abscess, hematoma, bulla, and seroma;

Excision of a single epidermal lesion without characteristics of malignancy, no larger than five millimeters (5 mm) in size and no deeper than the dermal layer of the skin;

Incision and curettage of a nonrecurrent chalazion;

Simple repair of an eyelid laceration no larger than two and one-half centimeters (2.5 cm) and no deeper than the orbicularis muscle and not involving the eyelid margin or lacrimal drainage structures; or

Removal of foreign bodies in the eyelid not involving lid margin, lacrimal drainage structures, and extending no deeper than the orbicularis muscle;

An optometrist who uses a local anesthetic in the manner allowed by this subdivision (12)(E)(i)(e ) shall provide to the board of optometry proof that the optometrist has current CPR certification by an organization approved by the board; provided, that the optometrist may meet this requirement by providing proof to the board that another person who has current CPR certification will be present in the office of the optometrist at all times that a local anesthetic is used by the optometrist in conjunction with the treatment of an eyelid lesion. Compliance with this provision shall also require that the optometrist maintain in the optometrist's office an AED at all times that a local anesthetic is administered by the optometrist;

All optometrists practicing in this state are prohibited from using nondiagnostic ophthalmic lasers. All optometrists practicing in this state are also prohibited from performing cataract surgery or any surgical procedure requiring other than a topical anesthetic. All optometrists practicing in this state are also prohibited from performing radial keratotomy;

Any optometrist practicing under the authority of this section shall be held to the same standards of care as that of other physicians providing similar services. No optometrist shall practice under this section unless and until the optometrist has submitted to the board evidence of satisfactory completion of all education requirements of § 63-8-112 and has been certified by the board as educationally qualified;

One who is engaged in the practice of optometry as a profession, as hereinabove defined, and who has sufficient education and professional competence, as determined by the board, and who has transcript credit of at least six (6) quarter hours in a course or courses in general and ocular pharmacology, with particular emphasis on diagnostic pharmaceutical agents applied topically to the eye, from a college or university accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization that is recognized or approved by the board, is authorized to utilize in connection therewith diagnostic pharmaceutical agents (miotics, mydriatics, cycloplegics and anesthetics) applied topically only;

“Principal office” means the office location so designated by the optometrist involved; provided, that such office is the location at which the optometrist engages in the majority of the optometrist's practice;

“Standard examination” means the examination prescribed by § 63-8-115; and

“State” means any of the fifty (50) states of the union, the District of Columbia and territories of the United States.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3654a10; Code 1932, § 7027; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 1; 1939, ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7027; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 37; 1975, ch. 116, § 1; modified; Acts 1977, ch. 490, § 2; 1979, ch. 406, §§ 1-8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-802; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 34; 1987, ch. 217, § 1; 1993, ch. 295, § 1; 2003, ch. 167, § 1; 2005, ch. 4, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 638, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 638, § 2 provided that the board of optometry is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act, which added subdivision (E)(i)(e ) in the definition of “practice of optometry as a profession.” All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Drug or medicine provisions related to optometrists, §§ 53-10-104, 53-10-105.

Prohibition against optometrists dispensing legend drugs without a prescription, § 53-10-101.

63-8-103. Board of optometry — Created — Members — Terms.

A board is created that shall be known and designated as the board of optometry. This board shall consist of five (5) members, all of whom shall be licensed to practice the full scope of optometry and be residents of Tennessee and actively practicing optometrists in Tennessee for a period of five (5) or more years immediately preceding their appointment.

No person shall be eligible for appointment who is in any way connected with or has any financial interest in the optical dispensary or optical department of any institution of learning or in the wholesale optical or optometric supply business.

The present board members shall serve out their respective terms. Thereafter, on a staggered basis, members shall be appointed for five-year terms. No member shall serve for more than ten (10) consecutive years.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a12; Code 1932, § 7029; C. Supp. 1950, § 7029; Acts 1979, ch. 406, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-803; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 1; 2003, ch. 167, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-131 — 63-1-133, 68-1-101.

The board of optometry, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-8-104. Oath of board members.

All members of the board shall, before entering upon the duties of their office, take and subscribe to the oath, filed with the secretary-treasurer of the board.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a12; Code 1932, § 7029; C. Supp. 1950, § 7029; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-804.

63-8-105. Appointments to the board.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor. Members may be appointed from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested optometric groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Association of Optometric Physicians. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

A member shall continue to serve until that member's successor is appointed. A vacancy created by the death, resignation or removal of a member shall be temporarily filled by the board after thirty (30) days. The person filling such vacancy shall serve until the governor makes the appointment as provided in this section. An appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a12; Code 1932, § 7029; C. Supp. 1950, § 7029; Acts 1955, ch. 331, § 1; 1979, ch. 406, § 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-805; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 46; 1989, ch. 428, § 2; 2011, ch. 164, § 1; 2012, ch. 696, § 1.

63-8-106. Removal of members of board.

The governor or the board shall have the right to remove from office any or all of the members of the board for inefficiency, neglect of duty or the violation of this chapter.

If the certificate of registration or license of any member of the board is suspended or revoked for cause after the hearing provided for in this chapter, the member's membership on the board shall automatically cease.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a12; Code 1932, § 7029; C. Supp. 1950, § 7029; Acts 1979, ch. 406, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-806.

63-8-107. Officers of board — Meetings — Examinations.

The board shall choose one (1) of its members as chair, one (1) as vice chair and one (1) as secretary-treasurer, annually.

The board may meet, in its discretion, at such times and places as it may deem proper for the examination of applicants who wish to practice optometry in this state and for the transaction of business.

The board shall offer the standard examination for the issuance of the certificate of fitness at least twice a year.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a13; Code 1932, § 7030; C. Supp. 1950, § 7030; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 39; 1979, ch. 406, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-807; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 3.

63-8-108. Quorum — Records of board.

A majority of the members of the board shall at all times constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the proceedings of the board shall be recorded in a minute book that shall be open at all reasonable times to public inspection.

The board shall keep a record book in which shall be registered the name, address and a certificate of fitness, a license, certificate of registration or permit of all persons legally entitled to practice optometry in this state, together with the names and addresses of those optometrists whose certificates or licenses have been suspended or revoked.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a12; Code 1932, § 7029; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7029; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-808.

63-8-109. Reports of board.

The secretary-treasurer of the board shall make such reports of the operation of the board as requested by the governor, appropriate committees of the general assembly or as otherwise required by law.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 32; Shan. Supp., § 3654a13; Code 1932, § 7030; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7030; modified; Acts 1979, ch. 406, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-809.

63-8-110. Compensation of board members.

The members of the board shall be paid their expenses, including mileage, hotel expenses, meals and the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) per diem when actually engaged in the discharge of their official duties. Each member shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 24; Shan. Supp., § 3654a13; Code 1932, § 7030; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 3; 1939, ch. 90, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 7030; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 39, modified; Acts 1974, ch. 614, § 1; 1976, ch. 426, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(115); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-810; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 4; 2003, ch. 167, § 4.

63-8-111. Administrative support.

The board shall receive administrative support from the division.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3654a13; Code 1932, § 7030; C. Supp. 1950, § 7030; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 39; modified; impl. am. Acts. 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-811; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 34; 1989, ch. 428, § 5.

63-8-112. Powers of board — Examinations.

The board is given authority to:

Make rules, regulations, policies and procedures not inconsistent with the laws of this state for the proper performance of its duties to carry out the purposes and to enforce this chapter;

Provide a standard of efficiency as to the moral, educational and experience qualifications and fitness of all persons who desire to practice optometry in Tennessee in conformity with this chapter;

Conduct both written examinations and written or oral clinical examinations of such character as to thoroughly test the qualifications of applicants and refuse to grant a certification to any person who, in its discretion, is found deficient. The board may prepare its own examinations, contract for the preparation of examinations or questions and may select appropriate standardized examinations, such as that of the National Board of Examiners in Optometry and the International Association of Board of Examiners in Optometry. The board is authorized to pay any expenses involved with conducting the examinations, including expenses involved with contracting with persons who participate in the examination process. The board shall not issue a certificate to any person beyond the scope of that person's education and training as determined by the board;

Certify optometrists to administer and prescribe pharmaceutical agents for treatment and perform primary eye care procedures as provided in § 63-8-102(12)(E). No optometrist shall be certified to prescribe or use pharmaceutical agents for treatment purposes in the practice of optometry unless and until that optometrist meets all of the following:

The optometrist has been certified to utilize diagnostic pharmaceutical agents;

The optometrist has completed at least one hundred fifty (150) classroom hours and at least forty (40) hours of clinical experience relative to diagnosis and treatment of ocular disease, including the use of pharmaceutical agents; and

The optometrist has taken and successfully passed the examination administered by or approved by the board;

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the board of optometry from requiring additional education, training or experience of an optometrist before allowing an optometrist to examine, diagnose, manage and treat conditions and diseases of the eye and eyelid authorized by this chapter;

The board shall require each optometrist certified to use pharmaceutical agents for treatment purposes in the practice of optometry to complete a minimum of ten (10) hours of continuing education annually on diagnosis and treatment and use of pharmaceutical agents in the practice of optometry;

The board shall provide the board of pharmacy semiannually with a list of optometrists so certified pursuant to this section and shall provide each certified optometrist with an application certificate that shall be prominently displayed in the optometrist's professional office;

Investigate possible violations of and enforce this chapter;

Determine the members to attend the meetings of the persons responsible for examining and licensing optometrists in other jurisdictions and other meetings or conventions that will assist the board in performing its duties. Members shall be paid their expenses in attending such meetings in accordance with state travel regulations;

Seek injunctions to prevent violations of this chapter. Such actions shall be brought in the chancery court of Davidson County or the chancery court of the county in which the defendant resides or does business. Such actions may be brought by ten (10) or more licensed optometrists or a state association of optometrists as well as by the board;

Issue, in its discretion, a certification of identification, upon the payment of a fee as set by the board to a legal, ethical and competent practitioner of optometry in this state who may desire to become licensed in another state;

Issue, in its discretion, a duplicate certificate in the event the original is lost or destroyed. The person entitled thereto must make written application to the board for a duplicate, under affidavit setting forth that such certificate was lost or destroyed and the circumstances under which the loss or destruction occurred. The fee for issuing the duplicate shall be set by the board and must accompany the application. Should the original subsequently be found, it must be forwarded immediately to the secretary-treasurer and not be used by the person to whom issued originally or by any other person; and

Set information requirements for ocular prescriptions.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3654a16; Code 1932, § 7031; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 4; 1939, ch. 90, §§ 1, 5; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7031; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 39; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 40; 1976, ch. 426, § 4; 1979, ch. 406, §§ 14-17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-814; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 35; 1987, ch. 217, § 2; 1989, ch. 428, § 6; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 51-53; 1993, ch. 295, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Prohibition against optometrists dispensing legend drugs without a prescription, § 53-10-101.

63-8-113. Unlawful practices — Advertising.

It is unlawful for any person not duly licensed in accordance with this chapter to:

Engage in the practice of optometry;

Claim to be a practitioner of optometry;

Attempt by any means whatsoever to determine the kind or power of ophthalmic materials needed by any person to remedy or relieve defects of vision or muscular anomalies;

Hold out as a registered or licensed optometrist;

Hold out as being able to examine the human eye for the purpose of fitting or prescribing ophthalmic materials;

Test the vision of any person by any means for the purpose of fitting that person with or prescribing ophthalmic materials;

Display a sign or symbol that leads the public to believe that such person is an optometrist;

Make measurements involving the eyes or the optical requirement thereof for the purpose of prescribing ophthalmic materials;

Unless otherwise authorized by law, fill an order or prescription for ophthalmic materials; or

Unless otherwise authorized by law, sell or dispense ophthalmic materials.

It is unlawful for any person, including optometrists licensed under this chapter, to:

Impersonate a licensed optometrist;

Practice optometry under a false or assumed name;

Peddle, sell or render optometric services from door to door;

Canvass or solicit ophthalmic materials or optometric services in person or by agents, except as authorized by the board. Advertising in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board is not solicitation;

Practice optometry after the person's certificate of fitness or registration has been revoked or during suspension of same or, after failing to pay the annual renewal fee or after failing to submit satisfactory evidence of having met minimum continuing education requirements as set by the board;

Offer optometric services or ophthalmic materials as a prize, premium or gift, separately or in combination with other merchandise or services, except as authorized by the board; or

Discount optometric services contingent upon the purchase of ophthalmic materials or to otherwise tie in the performing of optometric services with the purchase of ophthalmic materials.

It is unlawful for any licensed optometrist to:

Advertise optometric services or ophthalmic materials, except as provided in subsection (d);

Practice optometry as an employee of any person or business or organization not engaged primarily in health care delivery;

Practice optometry under a name other than the optometrist's own unless board approved;

Appoint agents or other persons to take orders for optometric services or ophthalmic materials;

Split or share fees with any person or organization in return for solicitation of customers by that person or organization;

Practice or offer to practice optometry in or in conjunction with any retail store or other commercial establishment where merchandise is displayed or offered for sale. Any licensed, registered optometrist practicing in premises of such type prior to April 17, 1967, shall be permitted to continue the independent practice in that optometrist's present location or in such new location to which the retail store or other commercial establishment might move; but when any such optometrist vacates any such premises, no other optometrist shall be permitted to practice in such vacated premises; or

Engage in practice in any temporary or mobile office except as authorized by the board or any office that does not have the appropriate instrumentation for diagnosis and treatment for the practice of optometry as established by the board.

An optometrist may advertise ophthalmic materials, including prices. All advertising by persons licensed to practice optometry in this state, regardless of the media employed for such advertising, shall be subject to the requirements and limitations of this section, as follows:

No person shall advertise optometric services or ophthalmic materials by statements that are fraudulent, deceptive or likely to mislead the public, such as bait and switch tactics;

No person shall advertise or infer through advertising that the person has superior professional skills or competence, except board certification may be listed;

No person shall advertise to guarantee optometric services or use words of similar import;

All advertising shall contain the optometrist's name and the designation “O.D.” or “Doctor of Optometry” or a professional corporation name, so long as such corporate name does not permit or imply action, advertising, services or practices forbidden by this chapter or rules and regulations of the board and such corporate name has been approved in advance by the board as being in compliance with the foregoing; and

Optometrists shall not advertise routine optometric services such as eye examinations except in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board.

The board is given authority to place reasonable time, place and manner restrictions on the advertising of optometric services if it finds that to be in the public interest. Further, the board may require that any advertising disclose any information necessary to protect the public, including whether specialists are certified.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3654a11; Code 1932, § 7028; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 2; 1939, ch. 90, §§ 1, 3; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7028; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 38; 1967, ch. 84, § 1; 1977, ch. 490, § 1; 1979, ch. 406, §§ 18, 31; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-815; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 7.

Cross-References. Advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty, § 63-1-145.

Exemption from licensing requirements for practice of medicine, § 63-6-204.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocations, § 63-6-214.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 91-56, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (6/4/91).

63-8-114. Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed:

As applying to medical doctors and doctors of osteopathic medicine lawfully entitled to practice their profession in this state;

As applying to an optometric faculty member licensed in another state and employed full time by an accredited school or college of optometry in this state; provided, that the practice of the faculty member is limited and is incidental to the faculty member's employment at the accredited school or college of optometry in the state of Tennessee. An optometry faculty member is limited to the scope of such member's license unless the member has passed an examination or a standardized examination that has been utilized by the therapeutic certification panel. An optometric faculty member may not practice beyond the scope of a fully certified Tennessee optometrist. This shall not be construed as a grant of permission for the optometric faculty member to engage in the private practice of optometry in any form. It is the responsibility of the dean of the school or college of optometry to apply to the board for an exemption for each such faculty member;

To prevent persons, firms and corporations from selling ophthalmic lenses or ophthalmic products at wholesale in a permanently established place of business on prescription to those who are legally qualified to prescribe them, nor to prevent an optical mechanic from doing the merely mechanical work upon such lenses or frames or fitting thereof nor to prevent the wholesale house from selling ready-to-wear eyeglasses or spectacles as merchandise, at wholesale, to merchants for the purpose of resale as merchandise, when neither the wholesaler nor purchaser to whom the wholesaler sells practices optometry;

To prevent a retail merchant from selling ready-to-wear spectacles or eyeglasses if such merchant does not assist the customer in fitting or selecting such products or otherwise engage in the practice of optometry; however, contact lenses, with or without prescription power, may not be ordered, sold or dispensed by a retail merchant;

To prevent licensed dispensing opticians from preparing, adapting and dispensing ophthalmic materials within the scope of their lawful practice; or

To prohibit a charitable clinic from employing or contracting with an optometrist; provided, that the contractual relationship between the optometrist and the charitable clinic is evidenced by a written contract, job description, or documentation, containing language that does not restrict the optometrist from exercising independent professional judgment in the practice of optometry;

For the purposes of this subdivision (6), the term “charitable clinic” means an entity that meets the following standards:

Has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or is a distinct part of an entity that has received such a determination of exemption;

Has clinical facilities located in this state;

Has a primary mission to provide health care or dental care services to low-income, uninsured, or underserved individuals;

Provides one (1) or more of the following services for free or at a discounted rate:

Medical care;

Dental care;

Mental health care; or

Prescription medications;

Utilizes volunteer healthcare professionals and nonclinical volunteers; and

Is not required to be licensed under § 68-11-202(a)(1).

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3654a11; Code 1932, § 7028; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 2; 1939, ch. 90, §§ 1, 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7041.1 (Williams, § 7028); Acts 1967, ch. 84, § 2; 1979, ch. 406, §§ 19, 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-816; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 8; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 2005, ch. 4, § 3; 2016, ch. 766, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 13 provided that the provisions of that act shall be liberally construed to effect its purpose, and insofar as the provisions of that act may be inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of ch. 428 shall be controlling.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

63-8-115. Qualifications of applicants.

Every person who desires to practice optometry in this state shall submit an application to the board. Each applicant must show sufficient information for the board to determine that the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

Is over twenty-one (21) years of age;

Is of good moral character;

Is a graduate of a school or college of optometry accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization that is recognized or approved by the board and is in good standing, as determined by the board; and

Has passed examinations and met the requirements established by the board for the scope of practice desired.

An applicant who is licensed to practice optometry in a state other than Tennessee, in addition to the foregoing requirements, must show that the applicant is an optometrist in good standing in such state. If the applicant has been disciplined, the applicant must fully set forth the circumstances surrounding the discipline, so that the board may determine therefrom the applicant's character and fitness.

All applications to take examinations shall be accompanied by nonrefundable fees to defray the cost of preparing and conducting the examination and the application process as determined by the board.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 3654a19; Code 1932, § 7032; Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 5; 1939, ch. 90, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7032; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 41; 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1976, ch. 426, § 5; 1979, ch. 406, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-817; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 9; 1989, ch. 523, § 54; 2003, ch. 167, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Protection of Aliens, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 235.

63-8-116. Display of certificate.

Each person to whom a certificate of registration is issued shall keep the certificate conspicuously displayed in that person's office, as required by § 63-1-109 and shall when requested exhibit the same to any member or representative of the board.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 3654a27b1; Code 1932, § 7036; Acts 1939, ch. 90, § 1; 1947, ch. 9, § 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7036; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-818.

63-8-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-8-117 (Acts 1935, ch. 129, § 5; 1939, ch. 90, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 7032; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-819), concerning jury duty exemption for optometrists, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 8, effective January 1, 2009.

63-8-118. Discrimination between ocular practitioners prohibited.

No state board, commission or department created or existing by act of the general assembly, including public schools or other state agencies in the performance of their duties, shall in any way show any discrimination between ocular practitioners. All boards or commissions shall honor ocular reports or other professional services by legally qualified and licensed optometrists in this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 90, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7027; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-820.

63-8-119. Annual registration — Continuing education.

Every registered optometrist who desires to continue to practice in this state shall pay an annual renewal fee to defray the cost of regulating optometry and shall furnish satisfactory evidence of having met minimum continuing education requirements, as set by the board. The board may, in its sole discretion, waive the annual educational requirement and/or fee in cases of certified illness, disability, other undue hardship or retirement.

The board shall annually arrange for or approve a program or programs of continuing optometric education held in this state sufficient to meet the minimum annual educational requirements for each level of practice. The board shall list on its website the organizations whose continuing education courses are deemed approved to meet the requirements of the board. The courses offered by these organizations shall be considered approved by the board and shall be available to optometrists as a means of satisfying their annual continuing education obligation, in addition to the continuing education courses which have been approved by the Council on Optometric Practitioner Education.

The board is authorized to use such portion of the annual renewal fees as is deemed necessary or proper to provide for continuing optometric educational programs.

The board is authorized to adopt such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary or appropriate for establishing an approved program or programs of continuing optometric education, including, but not limited to, those prescribing the substantive content of all courses or other forms of optometric education that will satisfy the annual educational requirement.

The board shall issue annual renewal certificates to optometrists who pay their annual renewal fees and furnish satisfactory evidence of having met minimum continuing education requirements.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations providing for the automatic revocation of the certificates of optometrists failing to meet the terms of this section.

After hearing, the board may provide conditions for the reinstatement of the certificates. These conditions may include, but are not limited to, the payment of delinquent fees, the payment of a civil penalty, the attendance or completion of courses of study, the passage of examinations, the passage of physical or mental examinations and the treatment of any physical or mental ailments.

After hearing, the board may refuse to reinstate the certificates revoked under this section upon any of the grounds set forth in § 63-8-120.

The board may formulate a policy that would allow retirees to practice where their services are needed on a temporary basis.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (i).

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7033; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 42; 1963, ch. 293, § 1; 1974, ch. 543, § 1; 1976, ch. 406, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-821; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 36; 1986, ch. 675, § 6; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 30-32; 1989, ch. 428, § 10; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 55, 56; 2010, ch. 719, § 1.

Cross-References. Licensing and registration, §§ 63-1-103-112.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974)